Oklahoma, session 2026, SB87.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 840-2.20, as


last amended by Section 172, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (74 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 840-2.20), is amended to read as follows:


Section 840-2.20. A. The Director of the Office of Management


and Enterprise Services shall promulgate such emergency and


permanent rules regarding leave and holiday leave as are necessary


to assist the state and its agencies.



Req. No. 1046 Page 1


The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services, in adopting new rules, amending rules and repealing rules,


shall ensure that the following provisions are incorporated:


1. Eligible employees who enter on duty or who are reinstated


after a break in service shall receive leave benefits in accordance


with the schedule outlined below. Leave shall be accrued based upon


hours worked, paid leave, and holidays, but excluding overtime, not


to exceed the total possible work hours for the pay period. Years


of service shall be based on cumulative periods of employment


calculated in the manner that cumulative service is determined for


longevity purposes pursuant to Section 840-2.18 of this title.


Employees may accumulate more than the maximum annual leave


accumulation limits shown in the schedule below provided that such


excess is used during the same calendar year in which it accrues or


within twelve (12) months of the date on which it accrues, at the


discretion of the appointing authority. If an employee whose job


duties include providing fire protection services, law enforcement


services or services with the Department of Corrections is unable to


use excess leave as provided for in this paragraph because the


employee’s request for leave is denied by the employee’s appointing


authority and the denial of leave is due to extraordinary


circumstances such that taking leave could pose a threat to public


safety, health or welfare, the employee shall receive compensation


at the employee’s regular rate of pay for the amount of excess leave

Req. No. 1046 Page 2


the employee is unable to use. Such compensation shall be paid at


the end of the time period during which the excess leave was


required to have been used;


2. On and after the effective date of this act July 1, 2023,


the following accrual rates and accumulation limits apply to


eligible employees as follows:


ACCRUAL RATES ACCUMULATION


LIMITS


Cumulative


Years of Annual Sick Annual


Service Leave Leave Leave


Persons employed 0-5 yrs = 15 day/yr 15 days/yr 30 days


5-10 yrs = 18 day/yr 15 days/yr 80 days


10-20 yrs = 20 day/yr 15 days/yr 80 days


over 20 yrs = 25 day/yr 15 days/yr 80 days


Following an emergency declaration as described in Section 683.8


of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the accumulation limits for


annual leave shall temporarily increase and shall carryover to the


end of the fiscal year following the year in which the emergency


declaration ended.


All annual leave that accrued or expired during the period of


the emergency declarations issued by the Governor in 2020 and 2021


in response to the novel coronavirus (COVID-19) shall carry over to


the end of the fiscal year following the year in which the emergency

Req. No. 1046 Page 3


declaration ended regardless of regulatory provisions that establish


a maximum amount of annual leave that may be accumulated by an


employee of this state. Expired annual leave governed by this


subsection shall be reinstated as of May 7, 2021, and accumulation


limits for annual leave shall not apply to amounts accrued or


reinstated pursuant to this subsection. Eligibility for


reinstatement of annual leave is limited to employees currently


employed by this state on May 7, 2021;


3. Temporary employees and other limited term employees are


ineligible to accrue, use, or be paid for sick leave and annual


leave. Such employees shall be eligible for paid holiday leave at


the discretion of the appointing authority;


4. Except as provided in paragraph 2 of this subsection,


employees shall not be entitled to retroactive accumulation of leave


as a result of amendments to this section;


5. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services shall assist agencies in developing policies to prevent


violence in state government workplaces without abridging the rights


of state employees. Such policies shall include a paid


administrative leave provision as a cooling-off period which the


Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services is


authorized to provide pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Act.


Such leave shall not be charged to annual or sick leave


accumulations;

Req. No. 1046 Page 4


6. State employees who terminated their employment in the state


service on or after October 1, 1992, may be eligible to have sick


leave accrued at the time of termination of employment restored if


they return to state employment provided that the state employees’


enter-on-duty dates for reemployment occur on or before two (2)


years after their termination of employment and they are eligible to


accrue sick leave before the two (2) years expire;


7. Employees who are volunteer firefighters pursuant to the


Oklahoma Volunteer Firefighters Act and who are called to fight a


fire shall not have to use any accrued leave or need to make up any


time due to the performance of their volunteer firefighter duties;


8. Employees who are reserve municipal police officers pursuant


to Section 34-101 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes and who miss


work in performing their duties in cases of emergency shall not have


to use any accrued leave or need to make up any time due to the


performance of their reserve municipal police officer duties;


9. Employees who are reserve deputy sheriffs pursuant to


Section 547 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes and who miss work


in performing their duties in case of emergency shall not have to


use any accrued leave or need to make up any time due to the


performance of their reserve deputy sheriff duties;


10. For purposes of the computation required by this section,


any service performed by a person during which the person received


compensation for duties performed for the state shall be counted if

Req. No. 1046 Page 5


payment for such service was made using state fiscal resources. The


provisions of this section shall not apply to elected or appointed


justices or judges, including special judges, who perform service in


the trial or appellate courts. The provisions of this section shall


apply to persons who perform services as an administrative law judge


within the executive department and employees of the judicial


branch; and


11. Eligible employees shall be entitled to paid maternity


parental leave as provided for in Section 840-2.20D of this title.


B. Nothing in law is intended to prevent or discourage an


appointing authority from disciplining or terminating an employee


due to abuse of leave benefits or absenteeism. Appointing


authorities are encouraged to consider attendance of employees in


making decisions regarding promotions, pay increases, and


discipline.


C. Upon the transfer of a function in state government to an


entity outside state government, employees may, with the agreement


of the outside entity, waive any payment for leave accumulations to


which the employee is entitled and authorize the transfer of the


leave accumulations or a portion thereof to the outside entity.


D. All permanent employees of the state shall be eligible to


carry over a maximum of six hundred forty (640) hours of annual


leave each year. Additionally, all employees shall be paid up to a



Req. No. 1046 Page 6


maximum of six hundred forty (640) hours of annual leave upon


separation from state service.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 32, 1st


Extraordinary Session, O.S.L. 2023 (74 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 840-


2.20D), is amended to read as follows:


Section 840-2.20D. A. Any full-time employee of this state who


has been employed by the state agency for at least two (2) years


prior to the request for leave shall be entitled to six (6) weeks of


paid maternity parental leave following the birth or adoption of the


employee’s child.


B. Paid maternity parental leave pursuant to this section shall


be in addition to and not in place of sick leave due to pregnancy,


as authorized by Section 840-2.20 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


C. An employee who is granted maternity parental leave pursuant


to the provisions of this section shall receive the employee’s


annual salary without interruption during the maternity parental


leave. For purposes of determining seniority, pay or pay


advancement, and performance awards, and for the receipt of any


benefit that may be affected by maternity parental leave, the


service of the employee shall be considered uninterrupted by the


maternity parental leave.





Req. No. 1046 Page 7


D. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this


section.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1046 RD 1/19/2025 5:44:57 AM





































Req. No. 1046 Page 8